tests/agglut_bogus.dic
9
telo/BCDGSTV
balo/BCDSTV
bavu/BCDSTV
dasulo/BCDSTV
dalotu/BCDSTV
lesutu/BCDFSTV
mino/BS
xolo/FW
zula/FS
