tests/agglut_bogus.wrong
balotu
cabalotuvu
dalotuvusu
dadatelotu
cabatelosu
camino
bacaminosutu
dadatelotu
baminovu
faxolo
falesutu
faxolotu
fasolovu
fazula
caafasula
zulasuwu
